Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 3. Representation.

§ 91-8-301.
Representation: basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this article has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this article is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 91-8-411 and 91-8-602, a person who under this article may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor’s behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this article with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under Section 91-8-411(a).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-302.
Representation by holder of power of appointment.

To the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the holder of a power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder may represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-303.
Representation by fiduciaries and parents.

To the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

A conservator or guardian may represent and bind the estate that the conservator or guardian controls;

A conservator or guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator or guardian of the ward’s estate has not been appointed;

An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

A personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate;

A parent may represent and bind the person’s minor or unborn child if a conservator or guardian for the descendant has not been appointed;

A grandparent may represent the grandparent’s grandchild if that grandchild is not already represented by a parent under paragraph (6);

A person designated by the settlor either in the trust instrument or in a writing delivered to the trustee, or designated in a writing delivered to the trustee by a trust protector or trust advisor with power under the terms of the trust instrument to represent the beneficiaries of the trust, may represent and bind the beneficiaries; and

Any person acting in a fiduciary capacity shall exercise all rights and powers granted to a fiduciary under the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Acts created under Chapter 23, Title 91.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 20; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 419, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 91-8-304.
Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

Unless otherwise represented, whenever survivorship of another person is an express or implied condition of receiving property from a trust, the successor contingent remainder beneficiary may be represented and bound by the presumptive remainder beneficiary upon whose death the rights of the successor contingent remainder beneficiary depend, but only to the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the presumptive remainder beneficiary and the successor contingent remainder beneficiary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-305.
Appointment of representative.

If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this article, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem or other representative to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A guardian ad litem or other representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

A guardian ad litem or other representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this chapter, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a guardian ad litem or other representative may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual’s family.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2014.